Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 10. Financial Operations.

§ 63.2-1951.
Interest on support payments collected.

The Department shall pay interest to the payee as provided in this section on certain spousal or child support payments it collects which have been ordered by a court or established by administrative order to be paid to or through the Department to the payee and for which the Department has an assignment of rights or has been given an authorization to seek or enforce a support obligation as those terms are defined in §§

63.2-100

and

63.2-1900

. Such interest shall accrue, at the legal rate as established by §

6.2-301

, on all support payments collected by the Department and paid to the payee more than thirty days following the end of the month in which the payment was received by the Department in nonpublic assistance cases. Interest shall be charged to the Department on such payments if the Department has an established case and if the obligor or payor provides identifying information including the Department case number or the noncustodial parent’s name and correct social security number.

History.

1987, c. 609, § 63.1-250.1:1; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to support payment provisions, see §

20-60.5

.

Editor’s note.

Effective October 1, 2010, “§

6.2-301

” was substituted for “§ 6.1-330.53” to conform to the recodification of Title 6.1 by Acts 2010, c. 794.

§ 63.2-1952.
Interest on debts due.

Interest at the judgment interest rate as established by §

6.2-302

on any arrearage pursuant to an order being enforced by the Department pursuant to this chapter shall be collected by the Commissioner except in the case of a minor obligor during the period of his minority. The Commissioner shall maintain interest balance due accounts. In accordance with §

63.2-1908.1

, the Commissioner may compromise interest on debt owed to the Commonwealth for reimbursement of public assistance paid.

History.

1974, c. 413, § 63.1-267; 1976, c. 357; 1995, c. 483; 2002, c. 747; 2015, c. 506.

Editor’s note.

Effective October 1, 2010, “§

6.2-302

” is substituted for “§ 6.1-330.54” to conform to the recodification of Title 6.1 by Acts 2010, c. 794.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 506 added the third sentence.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1446 (1974).

§ 63.2-1953.
Disposition of funds collected as debts to Department.

Funds collected as a debt to the Department pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be placed in a special fund of the Department for use in the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1975, c. 302, § 63.1-251.1; 1988, c. 906, § 63.1-274.1; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1954.
Distribution of collection.

Support payments received by the Department pursuant to one or more judicial or administrative orders, or a combination thereof, shall be allocated among the obligees under such orders with priority given to payment of the order for current support. Where payments are received pursuant to two or more orders for current support, the Department shall prorate the payments on the basis of any amounts due for current support under each such order. Upon satisfaction of any amounts due for current support, the Department shall prorate the remainder of the payments on the basis of accrued arrearages owed to the obligees under each such order. Payments received pursuant to federal tax refund offset shall be allocated pursuant to subsection h of 45 C.F.R. § 303.72.

All support payments received by the Department shall be distributed to the obligee within two business days of receipt, provided that sufficient information accompanies the payment or is otherwise available to the Department within that time to identify the obligee and the place to which distribution should be made. The term “business day” means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or other day on which state offices are closed.

History.

1992, c. 199, § 63.1-251.2; 1997, c. 562; 2002, c. 747; 2015, c. 52.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 52 rewrote the first paragraph, which read “Support payments received by the Department or the Department’s designee shall be prorated among the obligees based upon the current amounts due pursuant to more than one judicial or administrative order, or a combination thereof, with any remaining amounts prorated among the obligees with orders for accrued arrearages in the same proration as the current support payments” and deleted “or the Department’s designee” preceding “shall be distributed” in the second paragraph.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 2.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Applicability. —

Proration statutes for multiple child support obligations embodied in §

63.2-1954

did not apply to mother two’s and mother one’s child support cases because the Virginia Department of Child Support Enforcement, while involved in mother one’s case, was not involved in mother two’s case. Miller v. Miller, 72 Va. Cir. 274, 2006 Va. Cir. LEXIS 268 (Fairfax County Nov. 21, 2006).

Virginia Division of Child Support Enforcement was ordered to distribute the proportionate share of arrearage payments made by fathers to purge a civil contempt among all the fathers’ families or children. —

Virginia Division of Child Support Enforcement was ordered to comply with §

63.2-1954

and distribute the proportionate share of arrearage payments made by fathers to purge a civil contempt among all the fathers’ families or children, despite the juvenile court’s order that payment go only to the parent or guardian for the child who had brought the contempt proceedings. The court held that §

63.2-1954

’s proration requirement did not infringe on the juvenile court’s authority to enforce its own child support orders or render it incapable of the efficient discharge of the duties committed to its care. In re Bridges, 65 Va. Cir. 304, 2004 Va. Cir. LEXIS 298 (Rockingham County July 30, 2004).

§ 63.2-1954.1.
Repealed by Acts 2010, c. 243, cl. 2, effective April 7, 2010.

Editor’s note.

Former §

63.2-1954.1

, relating to distribution of collections including Department-sponsored health care coverage, was enacted by Acts 2009, c. 713.

§ 63.2-1955.
Distribution of collections from federal tax refund offsets.

Distribution of amounts collected by the Department as a result of an offset made under the Federal Tax Refund Offset Program (P.L. 97-35, as amended) to satisfy non-TANF past-due support from a federal tax refund based upon a joint return shall be made when the Department is notified that the unobligated spouse’s proper share of the refund has been paid or 180 days following receipt of the offset, whichever is earlier. The Department shall establish procedures for the prompt refund of any incorrect offset amounts and the compensation of unobligated spouses for the payment of their shares to obligees.

History.

1997, c. 653, § 63.1-251.4; 1998, c. 781; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1956.
Release of excess funds to debtor.

Whenever any person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth has in its possession earnings, deposits, accounts, or balances in excess of the amount of the debt claimed by the Department plus $100, such person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision or department of the Commonwealth may, without liability under this chapter, release such excess to the debtor.

History.

1974, c. 413, § 63.1-259; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1957.
Unidentifiable moneys held in special account.

All moneys collected in fees, costs, attorney fees, interest payments, or other funds received by the Commissioner which are unidentifiable as to the support account against which they should be credited, shall be held in a special fund from which the Commissioner may make disbursement for any costs or expenses incurred in the administration or enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1974, c. 413, § 63.1-269; 1976, c. 357; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1958.
Charging off support debts as uncollectible.

Any support debt due the Department pursuant to §

63.2-1908

that the Commissioner deems uncollectible may be transferred from accounts receivable to a doubtful account, cease to be accounted as an asset, and discharged from its records.

History.

1974, c. 413, § 63.1-270; 1975, c. 596; 1976, c. 357; 1988, c. 906; 1992, c. 716; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1959.
Department exempt from fees.

No filing or recording fees, court fees, or fees for service of process shall be required from the Department by any clerk, auditor, sheriff or other local officer for the filing of any actions or documents authorized by this chapter or, for the service of any summons or other process in any action or proceeding authorized by this chapter.

History.

1988, c. 906, § 63.1-274.7; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1960.
Recovery of certain fees and costs.

The Department shall have the authority to assess and recover from the noncustodial parent in proceedings to enforce child support obligations against the noncustodial parent, reasonable attorneys’ fees. All such fees recovered in proceedings to collect child support arrearages shall be retained by the Department in a special fund for the support of the Division of Support Enforcement. The Department shall also have the authority to assess and recover costs in such cases. However, the Department shall not be entitled to recover attorneys’ fees or costs in any case in which the noncustodial parent prevails.

The Department shall have the authority to assess and recover the actual costs of genetic testing against the noncustodial parent if paternity is established. Where an original test is contested and additional testing is requested, the Department may require advance payment by the contestant. The genetic testing costs shall be set at the rate charged the Department by the provider of genetic testing services.

The Department shall have the authority to assess and recover the actual costs of intercept programs from the noncustodial parent. The intercept programs’ costs shall be set at the rate actually charged the Department.

The Department shall have the authority to assess and recover the actual costs of fees for service of process, and seizure and sale pursuant to a levy on a judgment in enforcement actions from the noncustodial parent.

The fees and costs that may be recovered pursuant to this section may be collected using any mechanism provided by this chapter.

History.

1991, c. 390, § 63.1-274.10; 1996, cc. 746, 1054; 1997, cc. 792, 896; 2002, c. 747; 2005, c. 880.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 880, in the first paragraph, substituted “attorneys”’ for “attorney’s” in the first and last sentences and inserted the second sentence.

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 7. Family Support Obligations. § 7.2 Family-Support Variations.
Rendleman.